test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_A_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲íiyä - ENGLISH : # CLASS_A_STEM_2

     k̲íiya+V+DIRECT+PAST: k̲íiyägan
     k̲íiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲íiyägang
     k̲íiya+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲íiyäganggang
     k̲íiya+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyägangang
     k̲íiya+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyägiinii
     k̲íiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyägaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyägaangaan
     k̲íiya+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲íiyä'uu
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'waa
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'waa
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'waang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲íiyä'wägan
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íiyä'aawaa
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲íiyä'aawaan
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲íiyä'waas
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲íiyä'aawaas
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyä'waa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyä'aawaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲íiyägang'waa
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲íiyägang'waang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyägang'waa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'wägiinii
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'wägaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'wägaangaan
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲íiyä'waaäsaa
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲íiyä'waaäs
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waaäsaang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waaäsga
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waaäsaas
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyä'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'waa'uuj
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'waa'uujang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲íiyä'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'waa'us
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íiyä'waa'ujaa
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waaäsaa'us
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲íiyä'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲íiyä'waa'ahlans
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲íiyä'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲íiyä'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲íiyä'waa'ahl
     k̲íiya+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲íiyä'waaäseehl
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲íiyä'ang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'angga
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'ang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'anggang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: k̲íiyä'anggan
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íiyä'aangaa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲íiyä'aangaan
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: k̲íiyä'ans
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲íiyä'aangaas
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyä'angang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyä'aangaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'anggang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲íiyägang'anggang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyägang'angang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'anggiinii
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'anggaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'anggaangaan
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲íiyä'angäsaa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲íiyä'angäs
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'angäsaang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'angäsga
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'angäsaas
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyä'angäsaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'ang'uuj
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'ang'uujang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲íiyä'angäsaa'uujang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'ang'us
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íiyä'ang'ujaa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'ang'uujaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'angäsaa'us
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'aang'ahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲íiyä'aang'ahlanggan
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'aang'ahlanggiinii
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'angäsaa'ahlans
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲íiyä'aang'ahlans
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲íiyä'aangaa'ahlang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲íiyä'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'aangaa'ahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: k̲íiyä'aang'ahl
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲íiyä'angäseehl
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲íiyä'ang'uu
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'ang'waa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'ang'waa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'ang'waang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲íiyä'ang'wägan
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íiyä'ang'aawaa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲íiyä'ang'aawaan
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲íiyä'ang'waas
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲íiyä'ang'aawaas
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyä'ang'waa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyä'ang'aawaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲íiyägang'ang'waa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲íiyägang'ang'waang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyägang'ang'waa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'ang'wägiinii
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'ang'wägaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'ang'wägaangaan
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲íiyä'ang'waaäsaa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲íiyä'ang'waaäs
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'ang'waaäsaang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'ang'waaäsga
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'ang'waaäsaas
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyä'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'ang'waa'uuj
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'ang'waa'uujang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲íiyä'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'ang'waa'us
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íiyä'ang'waa'ujaa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'ang'waaäsaa'us
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲íiyä'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyä'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲íiyä'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲íiyä'ang'waa'ahlans
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲íiyä'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲íiyä'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲íiyä'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲íiyä'ang'waa'ahl
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲íiyä'ang'waaäseehl
